California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(C) If a ward of the juvenile court is subject to the registration requirements set forth in Section 290 of the Penal Code, a court, in ordering the sealing of the juvenile records of the person, shall also provide in the order that the person is relieved from the registration requirement and for the destruction of all registration information in the custody of the Department of Justice and other agencies, entities, and officials.

(D) (i) A petition to seal the record or records relating to an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 that
 was committed after attaining 14 years of age and resulted in the adjudication of wardship by the juvenile court may only be filed or considered by the court pursuant to this section under the following circumstances:

(I) The person was committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, has attained 21 years of age, and has completed their period of probation supervision after release from the division.

(II) The person was not committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, has attained 18 years of age, and has completed any period of probation supervision related to that offense imposed by the court.

(ii) A record relating
 to an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 that was committed after attaining 14 years of age that has been sealed pursuant to this section may be accessed, inspected, or utilized in a subsequent proceeding against the person under any of the following circumstances:

(I) By the prosecuting attorney, as necessary, to make appropriate charging decisions or to initiate prosecution in a court of criminal jurisdiction for a subsequent felony offense, or by the prosecuting attorney or the court to determine the appropriate sentencing for a subsequent felony offense.

(II) By the prosecuting attorney, as necessary, to initiate a juvenile court proceeding to determine whether a minor shall be transferred from the juvenile court to a court of criminal jurisdiction pursuant to
 Section 707, and by the juvenile court to make that determination.

(III) By the prosecuting attorney, the probation department, or the juvenile court upon a subsequent finding by the juvenile court that the minor has committed a felony offense, for the purpose of determining an appropriate disposition of the case.

(IV) By the prosecuting attorney, or a court of criminal jurisdiction, for the purpose of proving a prior serious or violent felony conviction, and determining the appropriate sentence pursuant to Section 667 of the Penal Code.

(iii) (I) A record relating to an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 that was committed after attaining 14 years of age that has been sealed pursuant to
 this section may be accessed, inspected, or utilized by the prosecuting attorney in order to meet a statutory or constitutional obligation to disclose favorable or exculpatory evidence to a defendant in a criminal case in which the prosecuting attorney has reason to believe that access to the record is necessary to meet the disclosure obligation. A request to access information in the sealed record for this purpose, including the prosecutor’s rationale for believing that access to the information in the record may be necessary to meet the disclosure obligation and the date by which the records are needed, shall be submitted by the prosecuting attorney to the juvenile court. The juvenile court shall approve the prosecutor’s request to the extent that the court has, upon review of the relevant records, determined that access to a specific sealed record or portion of a sealed record is necessary to
 enable the prosecuting attorney to comply with the disclosure obligation. If the juvenile court approves the prosecuting attorney’s request, the court shall state on the record appropriate limits on the access, inspection, and utilization of the sealed record information in order to protect the confidentiality of the person whose sealed record is accessed pursuant to this clause. A ruling allowing disclosure of information pursuant to this subdivision does not affect whether the information is admissible in a criminal or juvenile proceeding. This clause does not impose any discovery
 obligations on a prosecuting attorney that do not already exist.

(II) A record that was sealed pursuant to this section that was generated in connection with the investigation, prosecution, or adjudication of a qualifying offense as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 679.10 of the Penal Code may be accessed by a judge or prosecutor for the limited purpose of processing a request of a victim or victim’s family member to certify victim helpfulness on the Form I-918 Supplement B certification or Form I-914 Supplement B declaration. The information obtained pursuant to this subclause shall not be disseminated to other agencies or individuals, except as necessary to certify victim helpfulness on the Form I-918 Supplement B certification or Form I-914 Supplement B declaration, and under no circumstances shall it be used to
 support the imposition of penalties, detention, or other sanctions upon an individual.

(III) This clause shall not apply to juvenile case files pertaining to matters within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300.

(iv) A sealed record that is accessed, inspected, or utilized pursuant to clause (ii) or (iii) shall be accessed, inspected, or utilized only for the purposes described therein, and the information contained in the sealed record shall otherwise remain confidential and shall not be further disseminated. The access, inspection, or utilization of a sealed record pursuant to clause (ii) or (iii) shall not be deemed an unsealing of the record and shall not require notice to any other entity.

(E) Subparagraph (D) does not apply in cases in which the offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 that was committed after attaining 14 years of age was dismissed or reduced to a misdemeanor by the court. In those cases, the person may petition the court to have the record sealed, and the court may order the sealing of the record in the same manner and with the same effect as otherwise provided in this section for records that do not relate to an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 that was committed after the person had attained 14 years of age.

(F) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (D) and (E), a record relating to an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 that was committed after attaining 14 years of age for which the person is required to register pursuant to Section 290.008 of the Penal Code shall not
 be sealed.

(G) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a person who has been convicted of a felony, or misdemeanor involving moral turpitude, may obtain record sealing relief pursuant to this section if all of that person’s felony convictions, and misdemeanor convictions involving moral turpitude, have been subsequently dismissed, vacated, pardoned, or reduced to misdemeanors that do not involve moral turpitude. Such post-conviction relief shall include, but not be limited to, a dismissal pursuant to Sections 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.4b, 1203.41, 1203.42, and 1203.43 of the Penal Code, vacatur pursuant to Section 236.14 of the Penal Code, and the reduction of a felony to a misdemeanor pursuant to Section 17 of the Penal Code.

(2) An unfulfilled order of restitution that has been
 converted to a civil judgment pursuant to Section 730.6 shall not be a bar to sealing a record pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) Outstanding restitution fines and court-ordered fees shall not be considered when assessing whether a petitioner’s rehabilitation has been attained to the satisfaction of the court and shall not be a bar to sealing a record pursuant to this subdivision.

(4) The person who is the subject of records sealed pursuant to this section may petition the superior court to permit inspection of the records by persons named in the petition, and the superior court may order the inspection of the records. Except as provided in subdivision (b), the records shall not be open to inspection.

(b) In any
 action or proceeding based upon defamation, a court, upon a showing of good cause, may order any records sealed under this section to be opened and admitted into evidence. The records shall be confidential and shall be available for inspection only by the court, jury, parties, counsel for the parties, and any other person who is authorized by the court to inspect them. Upon the judgment in the action or proceeding becoming final, the court shall order the records sealed.

(c) (1) Subdivision (a) does not apply to Department of Motor Vehicles records of any convictions for offenses under the Vehicle Code or any local ordinance relating to the operation, stopping and standing, or parking of a vehicle where the record of any such conviction would be a public record under Section 1808 of the Vehicle Code. However, if a court orders a
 case record containing any such conviction to be sealed under this section, and if the Department of Motor Vehicles maintains a public record of such a conviction, the court shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles of the sealing and the department shall advise the court of its receipt of the notice.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, subsequent to the notification, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall allow access to its record of convictions only to the subject of the record and to insurers which have been granted requestor code numbers by the department. Any insurer to which a record of conviction is disclosed, when the conviction record has otherwise been sealed under this section, shall be given notice of the sealing when the record is disclosed to the insurer. The insurer may use the information contained in the record
 for purposes of determining eligibility for insurance and insurance rates for the subject of the record, and the information shall not be used for any other purpose nor shall it be disclosed by an insurer to any person or party not having access to the record.

(3) This subdivision does not prevent the sealing of any record which is maintained by any agency or party other than the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(4) This subdivision does not affect the procedures or authority of the Department of Motor Vehicles for purging department records.

(d) Unless for good cause the court determines that the juvenile court record shall be retained, the court shall order the destruction of a person’s juvenile court records
 that are sealed pursuant to this section as follows: five years after the record was ordered sealed, if the person who is the subject of the record was alleged or adjudged to be a person described by Section 601; or when the person who is the subject of the record reaches 38 years of age if the person was alleged or adjudged to be a person described by Section 602, except that if the subject of the record was found to be a person described in Section 602 because of the commission of an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 when the person was 14 years of age or older, the record shall not be destroyed. Any other agency in possession of sealed records may destroy its records five years after the record was ordered sealed.

(e) The court may access a file that has been sealed pursuant to this section for the limited purpose of verifying the
 prior jurisdictional status of a ward who is petitioning the court to resume its jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388. This access shall not be deemed an unsealing of the record and shall not require notice to any other entity.

(f) This section shall not permit the sealing of a person’s juvenile court records for an offense where the person is convicted of that offense in a criminal court pursuant to the provisions of Section 707.1. This subdivision is declaratory of existing law.

(g) (1) This section does not prohibit a court from enforcing a civil judgment for an unfulfilled order of restitution obtained pursuant to Section 730.6. A minor is not relieved from the obligation to pay victim restitution, restitution fines, and court-ordered
 fines and fees because the minor’s records are sealed.

(2) A victim or a local collection program may continue to enforce victim restitution orders, restitution fines, and court-ordered fines and fees after a record is sealed. The juvenile court shall have access to any records sealed pursuant to this section for the limited purposes of enforcing a civil judgment or restitution order.

(h) (1) On and after January 1, 2015, each court and probation department shall ensure that information regarding the eligibility for and the procedures to request the sealing and destruction of records pursuant to this section shall be provided to each person who is either of the following:

(A) A person for whom a petition has
 been filed on or after January 1, 2015, to adjudge the person a ward of the juvenile court.

(B) A person who is brought before a probation officer pursuant to Section 626.

(2) The Judicial Council shall, on or before January 1, 2015, develop informational materials for purposes of paragraph (1) and shall develop a form to petition the court for the sealing and destruction of records pursuant to this section. The informational materials and the form shall be provided to each person described in paragraph (1) when jurisdiction is terminated or when the case is dismissed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 782, Sec. 8.   (SB 1161)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

781.1.

A superior court or probation department shall not charge an applicant a fee for filing a petition to seal records under Section 781.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 582, Sec. 1.   (AB 1394)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

781.2.

(a) (1) On a monthly basis, the Department of Justice shall review state summary criminal history information and shall identify arrests that are eligible to be sealed.

(2) An arrest shall be eligible to be sealed if either of the following apply:

(A) The arrest only included misdemeanor offenses, at least one calendar year has elapsed since the date of the arrest, and all of the following apply:

(i) The person was younger than 18 years of age at the time of the arrest.

(ii) The arrest occurred on or after January 1, 1973.

(iii) There are currently no pending juvenile delinquency matters related to the arrest that have not yet been resolved, and the arrest did not result in a charge being sustained against the arrested individual. This includes, but is not limited to, situations where the arresting agency deemed the arrest a detention only, the prosecuting agency declined to file charges related to the arrest, all charges were dismissed, or the arrestee was acquitted of all charges.

(B) The arrest included a felony offense not listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707, at least three calendar years have elapsed since the date of the arrest, and all of the following apply:

(i) The person was younger than 18 years of age at the time of the arrest.

(ii) The arrest occurred on or after January 1, 1973.

(iii) There are currently no pending juvenile delinquency matters related to the arrest that have not yet been resolved and the arrest did not result in a charge being sustained against the arrested individual. This includes, but is not limited to, situations where the arresting agency deemed the arrest a detention only, the prosecuting agency declined to file charges related to the arrest, all charges were dismissed, or the arrestee was acquitted of all charges.

(b) The department shall provide a list of arrests that are identified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) to all agencies
 associated with the record of arrest.

(c) On a monthly basis, the arresting agency shall review the list of arrests provided pursuant to subdivision (b) and shall seal eligible arrest records if the arresting agency’s records do not contain information indicating that the arrest is not eligible to be sealed, without requiring an individual to petition for their arrest to be sealed.

(d) Within six months of receiving the list of arrests provided pursuant to subdivision (b), arresting agencies shall electronically report to the Department of Justice, in a manner prescribed by the Department of Justice, the records that shall be sealed.

(e) If arresting agencies have previously eliminated or sealed arrest records, then within
 six months of receiving the list of those arrests provided pursuant to subdivision (b), the agency shall electronically report to the Department of Justice, in a manner prescribed by the Department of Justice, that those records shall be sealed.

(f) The Department of Justice shall seal arrests reported pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of this section within 90 days. Any physical arrest records are exempt from this process and the Department of Justice shall seal those records at the point in which they are recorded in the state summary criminal history information repository.

(g) Commencing July 1, 2028, the Department of Justice shall annually publish statistics on the OpenJustice Web portal, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 13010, for each county regarding
 the total number of arrests in each of the following categories:

(1) The number of arrests identified pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) The number of arrests provided to arresting agencies pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) The number of arrests reported to be sealed pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e).

(4) The number of arrests where sealing is in-progress by the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e).

(5) The number of arrests where sealing has been completed by the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivisions (d), (e), and (f).

(h) Nothing in this section affects arrest statistics reported to the Department of Justice pursuant to Sections 13010, 13011, and 13012.

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027, subject to an appropriation for these purposes in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 811, Sec. 1.   (AB 1877)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

781.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 781, in any case where a minor has been cited to appear before a probation officer, has been taken before a probation officer pursuant to Section 626, or has been taken before any officer of a law enforcement agency, and no accusatory pleading or petition to adjudge the minor a ward of the court has been filed, the minor may request in writing that the law enforcement agency and probation officer having jurisdiction over the offense destroy their records of the arrest or citation. A copy of the request shall be served upon the district attorney of the county having jurisdiction over the offense. The law enforcement agency and probation officer having jurisdiction over the offense, upon a determination that the minor is factually innocent, shall, with the concurrence of the district attorney, seal their records with respect to the minor and the request for relief under this section for three years from the date of the arrest or citation and thereafter destroy the records and the request. A determination of factual innocence shall not be made pursuant to this subdivision unless the law enforcement agency and probation officer, with the concurrence of the district attorney, determine that no reasonable cause exists to believe that the minor committed the offense for which the arrest was made or the citation was issued. The law enforcement agency and probation officer having jurisdiction over the offense shall notify the Department of Justice, and any other law enforcement agency or probation officer that arrested or cited the minor or participated in the arrest or citing of the minor for an offense for which the minor has been found factually innocent under this subdivision, of the sealing of the minor’s records and the reason therefor. The Department of Justice and any law enforcement agency or probation officer so notified shall forthwith seal its records of the arrest or citation and the notice of sealing for three years from the date of the arrest or citation, and thereafter destroy those records and the notice of sealing. The law enforcement agency and probation officer having jurisdiction over the offense and the Department of Justice shall request the destruction of any records of the arrest or citation that they have given to any local, state, or federal agency or to any other person or entity. Each agency, person, or entity within the State of California receiving that request shall destroy its records of the arrest or citation and that request, unless otherwise provided in this section.

(b) If, after receipt by the law enforcement agency, probation officer, and the district attorney of a request for relief under subdivision (a), the law enforcement agency, probation officer, and district attorney do not respond to the request by accepting or denying the request within 60 days after the running of the statute of limitations for the offense for which the minor was cited or arrested or within 60 days after receipt of the petition in cases where the statute of limitations has previously lapsed, then the request shall be deemed to be denied. In any case where the request of a minor to the law enforcement agency and probation officer to have a record destroyed is denied, petition may be made to the juvenile court that would have had jurisdiction over the matter. A copy of the petition shall be served on the district attorney of the county having jurisdiction over the offense at least 10 days prior to the hearing thereon. The district attorney may present evidence to the court at the hearing. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any judicial determination of factual innocence made pursuant to this subdivision may be heard and determined upon declarations, affidavits, police reports, or any other evidence submitted by the parties that is material, relevant, and reliable. A finding of factual innocence and an order for the sealing and destruction of records pursuant to this subdivision or subdivision (d) shall not be made unless the court finds that no reasonable cause exists to believe that the minor committed the offense for which the arrest was made or the citation was issued. In any court hearing to determine the factual innocence of a minor, the initial burden of proof shall rest with the minor to show that no reasonable cause exists to believe that the minor committed the offense for which the arrest was made or the citation was issued. If the court finds that this showing of no reasonable cause has been made by the minor, then the burden of proof shall shift to the respondent to show that a reasonable cause exists to believe that the minor committed the offense for which the arrest was made or the citation was issued.

(c) If the court finds the minor to be factually innocent of the charges for which the arrest was made or the citation was issued, then the court shall order the law enforcement agency and probation officer having jurisdiction over the offense, the Department of Justice, and any law enforcement agency or probation officer that arrested or cited the minor or participated in the arrest or citation of the minor for an offense for which the minor has been found factually innocent under this section, to seal their records relating to the minor and the court order to seal and destroy those records, for three years from the date of the arrest or citation and thereafter to destroy those records and the court order to seal and destroy those records. The court shall also order the law enforcement agency and probation officer having jurisdiction over the offense and the Department of Justice to request the destruction of any records of the arrest that they have given to any local, state, or federal agency, person or entity. Each state or local agency, person or entity within the State of California receiving that request shall destroy its records of the arrest or citation and the request to destroy those records, unless otherwise provided in this section. The court shall give to the minor a copy of any court order concerning the destruction of the arrest or citation records.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 781, in any case where a minor has been arrested or a citation has been issued, and an accusatory pleading or petition to adjudge the minor a ward of the court has been filed, but not sustained, the minor may, at any time after dismissal of the proceeding, request in writing from the court that dismissed the proceeding a finding that the minor is factually innocent of the charges for which the arrest was made or the citation was issued. A copy of the request shall be served on the district attorney of the county in which the accusatory pleading or petition was filed at least 10 days prior to the hearing on the minor’s factual innocence. The district attorney may present evidence to the court at the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted as provided in subdivision (b). If the court finds the petitioner to be factually innocent of the charges for which the arrest was made or the citation was issued, then the court shall grant the relief as provided in subdivision (c).

(e) Notwithstanding Section 781, in any case where a minor has been arrested or cited and an accusatory pleading or petition to adjudge the minor a ward of the court has been filed, but not sustained, and it appears to the judge presiding at the proceeding that the minor was factually innocent of the offense, the court, upon the written or oral motion of any party in the case or on the court’s own motion, may grant the relief provided in subdivision (c). If the district attorney objects to the court granting that relief, the district attorney may request a hearing as to the minor’s factual innocence . This hearing shall be conducted as provided in subdivision (b).

(f) In any case where a minor who has been arrested or cited is granted relief pursuant to this section, the law enforcement agency and probation officer having jurisdiction over the offense or the court shall issue a written declaration to the minor stating that it is the determination of the law enforcement agency and probation officer having jurisdiction over the offense or the court that the minor is factually innocent of the charges for which the minor was arrested or cited and that the minor is thereby exonerated. Thereafter, the arrest or citation shall be deemed not to have occurred and the minor may answer accordingly any question relating to its occurrence.

(g) The Department of Justice shall furnish forms to be utilized by minors requesting the destruction of their arrest or citation records and for the written declaration that a minor was found factually innocent under this section.

(h) Documentation of arrest or citation records that are destroyed pursuant to this section that are contained in investigative police reports shall bear the notation “Exonerated” whenever reference is made to the minor. The minor shall be notified in writing by the law enforcement agency and probation officer having jurisdiction over the offense of the sealing and destruction of the arrest and citation records pursuant to this section.

(i) Any finding that a minor is factually innocent pursuant to this section shall not be admissible as evidence in any action.

(j) Destruction of records of arrest or citation pursuant to this section shall be accomplished by permanent obliteration of all entries or notations upon those records pertaining to the arrest or citation, and the record shall be prepared again so that it appears that the arrest or citation never occurred. However, where the only entries on the record pertain to the arrest or citation and the record can be destroyed without necessarily effecting the destruction of other records, then the document constituting the record shall be physically destroyed.

(k) No records shall be destroyed pursuant to this section if the minor or another individual arrested or cited for the same offense has filed a civil action against the peace officers, law enforcement agency, or probation officer that made the arrest, issued the citation, or commenced the proceedings and if the agency or officer that is the custodian of those records has received a certified copy of the complaint in the civil action, until the civil action has been resolved. Any records sealed pursuant to this section by the court in the civil action, upon a showing of good cause, may be opened and submitted into evidence. The records shall be confidential and shall be available for inspection only by the court, jury, parties, counsel for the parties, and any other person authorized by the court. Immediately following the final resolution of the civil action, records subject to this section shall be sealed and destroyed pursuant to this section.

(l) Any relief that is available to a minor under this section for an arrest or citation shall also be available for a minor who is taken into temporary custody and then released pursuant to Sections 625 and 626.

(m) This section shall not apply to any offense that is classified as an infraction.

(n) (1) This section shall be repealed on the effective date of a final judgment based on a claim under the California or United States Constitution holding that evidence that is relevant, reliable, and material may not be considered for purposes of a judicial determination of factual innocence under this section. For purposes of this subdivision, a judgment by the appellate division of a superior court is a final judgment if it is published and if it is not reviewed on appeal by a court of appeal. A judgment of a court of appeal is a final judgment if it is published and if it is not reviewed by the California Supreme Court.

(2) Any decision referred to in this subdivision shall be stayed pending appeal.

(3) If not otherwise appealed by a party to the action, any decision referred to in this subdivision that is a judgment by the appellate division of the superior court, shall be appealed by the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Conditionally repealed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

782.

(a) (1) A judge of the juvenile court in which a petition was filed or that has taken jurisdiction of a case pursuant to Section 750 may dismiss the petition, or may set aside the findings and dismiss the petition, if the court finds that the interests of justice and the welfare of the person who is the subject of the petition require that dismissal, or if it finds that they are not in need of treatment or rehabilitation. The court has jurisdiction to order dismissal or setting aside of the findings and dismissal regardless of whether the person who is the subject of the petition is, at the time of the order, a ward or dependent child of the court. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to require the court to maintain jurisdiction over a person who is the subject of a petition between the time the
 court’s jurisdiction over that person terminates and the point at which their petition is dismissed.

(2) (A) When exercising its discretion under paragraph (1) at the time the court terminates jurisdiction or at any time thereafter, the court shall consider and afford great weight to evidence offered by a person to prove mitigating circumstances are present, including, but not limited to, satisfactory completion of a term of probation, that rehabilitation has been attained to the satisfaction of the court, that dismissal of the petition would not endanger public safety, or that the underlying offense is connected to mental illness, prior victimization, or childhood trauma. Proof of the presence of one or more mitigating circumstances weighs greatly in favor of dismissing the petition.

(B) “Satisfactory completion of a term of probation” shall be interpreted
 consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 786.

(C) “Rehabilitation has been attained to the satisfaction of the court” shall be interpreted consistent with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 781.

(D) “Mental illness,” “childhood trauma,” “prior victimization,” and “endanger public safety” have the same meanings as defined in Section 1385 of the Penal Code. 

(E) The great weight standard set forth in this paragraph shall not be applicable in cases where an individual has been convicted in criminal court of a serious or violent felony.

(F) For the purposes of subparagraph (E), a “serious or violent felony” means any offense defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, or in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, of the Penal
 Code.

(G) The absence of the great weight standard under the circumstances described in this paragraph shall not affect the court’s authority under paragraph (1).

(b) The reasons for a decision under this section shall be stated orally on the record. The court shall also set forth the reasons in an order entered upon the minutes if requested by either party or in any case in which the proceedings are not being recorded electronically or reported by a court reporter. 

(c) The court has authority to exercise discretion pursuant to subdivision (a) at any time after the filing of the petition.

(d) The court has authority to exercise discretion pursuant to subdivision (a) regardless of whether a petition was sustained at trial, by admission or plea
 agreement.

(e) Dismissal of a petition, or setting aside of the findings and dismissal of a petition, pursuant to this section, after the person was declared a ward, does not alone constitute a sealing of records as defined in Section 781 or 786. Any unsealed records pertaining to the dismissed petition may be accessed, inspected, or used by the court, the probation department, the prosecuting attorney, or counsel for the minor in juvenile court proceedings commenced by the filing of a new petition alleging the person is a person described by Section 602.

(f) Dismissal of the petition, or setting aside the findings and dismissal of the petition, pursuant to this section does not relieve a person from the obligation to pay unfulfilled victim restitution ordered pursuant a civil judgment under Section 730.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 970, Sec. 1.   (AB 2629)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

783.

An adjudication that a minor violated any of the provisions enumerated in subdivision (d) of Section 13202.5 of the Vehicle Code shall be reported to the Department of Motor Vehicles at its office in Sacramento within 10 days of the adjudication pursuant to Section 1803 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1254, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

784.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon any adjudication that a minor violated any provision of law for which a report would be required under Section 1803 of the Vehicle Code, including any determination that because of the act the minor is a person described in Section 601 or 602 or that a program of supervision should be instituted for the minor, the clerk shall, not more than 30 days after the violation and in no case later than 10 days after the adjudication, prepare an abstract of the record, certify the abstract to be true and correct, and immediately forward the abstract to the Department of Motor Vehicles. The record shall be a public record subject to disclosure in the same manner as reports made under Section 1803 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1465, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

785.

(a) Where a minor is a ward of the juvenile court, the wardship did not result in the minor’s commitment to the Youth Authority, and the minor is found not to be a fit and proper subject to be dealt with under the juvenile court law with respect to a subsequent allegation of criminal conduct, any parent or other person having an interest in the minor, or the minor, through a properly appointed guardian, the prosecuting attorney, or probation officer, may petition the court in the same action in which the minor was found to be a ward of the juvenile court for a hearing for an order to terminate or modify the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. The court shall order that a hearing be held and shall give prior notice, or cause prior notice to be
 given, to those persons and by the means prescribed by Sections 776 and 779, by electronic
 service pursuant to Section 212.5, or where the means of giving notice is not prescribed by those sections, then by such means as the court prescribes.

(b) The petition shall be verified and shall state why jurisdiction should be terminated or modified in concise language.

(c) In determining whether or not the wardship shall terminate or be modified, the court shall be guided by the policies set forth in Section 202.

(d) In addition to its authority under this chapter, the Judicial Council shall adopt rules providing criteria for the consideration of the juvenile court in determining whether or not to terminate or modify jurisdiction pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 146.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

786.

(a) If a person who has been alleged or found to be a ward of the juvenile court satisfactorily completes (1) an informal program of supervision pursuant to Section 654.2, (2) probation under Section 725, or (3) a term of probation for any offense, the court shall order the petition dismissed. The court shall order sealed all records pertaining to the dismissed petition in the custody of the juvenile court, and in the custody of law enforcement agencies, the probation department, or the Department of Justice. Defense counsel for the minor shall not be ordered to seal their records. The court shall send a copy of the order to each agency and official named in the order, direct the agency or official to seal its records, and specify a date by which
 the sealed records shall be destroyed. If a record contains a sustained petition rendering the person ineligible to own or possess a firearm until 30 years of age pursuant to Section 29820 of the Penal Code, then the date the sealed records shall be destroyed is the date upon which the person turns 33 years of age. Each agency and official named in the order shall seal the records in its custody as directed by the order, shall advise the court of its compliance, and, after advising the court, shall seal the copy of the court’s order that was received. The court shall also provide notice to the person and the person’s counsel that it has ordered the petition dismissed and the records sealed in the case. The notice shall include an advisement of the person’s right to nondisclosure of the arrest and proceedings, as specified in subdivision (b).

(b) Upon
 the court’s order of dismissal of the petition, the arrest and other proceedings in the case shall be deemed not to have occurred and the person who was the subject of the petition may reply accordingly to an inquiry by employers, educational institutions, or other persons or entities regarding the arrest and proceedings in the case.
